Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201379-984
Employees retirement
system; actuary; employment; duties.

The board
of education or Class V Retirement System Board shall contract for the services
of an actuary who shall be the technical advisor of the board and the trustees
on matters regarding the operation of the retirement system. The actuary shall
(1) make a general investigation of the operation of the retirement system annually, which investigation
shall cover mortality, retirement, disability, employment, turnover, interest,
and earnable compensation, and (2) recommend tables to be used for all required
actuarial calculations. The actuary shall perform such other duties as may
be assigned by the board.

Laws 1951, c. 274, § 7, p. 915;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1038;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 619;

Laws 1998, LB 497, § 11;

Laws 2001, LB 711, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 64;

Laws 2013, LB263, § 21.